Hawaii, session 2025, SB390.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $17,700,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the sixteenth senatorial district, as follows: 1.   Aiea Elementary School A.   Design and construction for new multipurpose covered play court, including storage room and restrooms; equipment and appurtenances. Total funding                               $5,700,000 2.   Aiea High School A.   Plans, design, and construction for new visitor bleachers for outdoor track and field. Total funding                                 $600,000 B.   Plans and design for the athletics department weightroom. Total funding                                 $200,000 C.   Equipment for athletic training room. Total funding                                 $200,000 3.   Webling Elementary School A.   Plans, design, and construction for a new main office building; equipment and appurtenances. Total funding                              $10,000,000 4.   Department of Transportation A.   Plans and design for an emergency egress/ingress route for Pacific Palisades. Total funding                               $1,000,000 SECTION 2. The appropriation made for the capital improvement project authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3. The sums appropriated for the respective capital improvement projects set forth in section l shall be expended for the purposes of this Act as follows: (1)  The sums appropriated in items 1 through 3 shall be expended by the department of education; and (2)  The sum appropriated in item 4 shall be expended by the department of transportation. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________